Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska3-505
Airport authority; city officers and employees; transfer; retention of privileges; social security and pension plans; continuance of coverage.

Officers and employees of any board or department in or of a city may be transferred to the authority established in the city, and shall be eligible for such transfer and appointment without examination to offices and positions under the authority. Officers or employees of such city, who shall have accepted such transfer and who are at the time of such transfer members or beneficiaries of any existing pension or retirement system, shall continue to have the rights, privileges, obligations, and status with respect to such system or systems as are now prescribed by law. In a city of the metropolitan or of the primary class, the authority may enter into an agreement with the city to provide for the continued coverage of officers and employees of the authority, and for the coverage of such officers and employees not formerly employed by the city, under the city's social security system, pension plan, or retirement plan, and shall pay its proportionate cost of such pension or retirement plan and expense of social security coverage.

Laws 1957, c. 9, § 5, p. 118;

Laws 1959, c. 12, § 3, p. 125;

Laws 1963, c. 18, § 1, p. 97.